District of Columbia statutes.
29-407.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Domesticated corporation” means the domesticating corporation as it continues in existence after a domestication.

(2)

“Domesticating corporation” means the domestic nonprofit corporation that adopts a plan of domestication pursuant to § 29-407.03 or the foreign nonprofit corporation that approves a domestication pursuant to its organic law.

(3)

“Domestication” means a transaction authorized by this subchapter.

(4)

“Surviving corporation” means the corporation as it continues in existence immediately after consummation of a domestication pursuant to this subchapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History